Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1201.02
County attorney; qualifications;
exception.

(1) No
person shall seek nomination or appointment for the office of county attorney
in counties of Class 4, 5, 6, or 7, nor serve in that capacity, unless he or she has been admitted to the
practice of law in this state for at least two years next preceding the date
such person would take office and has practiced law actively in this state
during such two-year period, except that if no person who meets the requirements
of this subsection has filed for or
sought such office by the filing deadline for nomination or by the deadline
for applications for appointment, the provisions of this subsection shall
not apply to any person seeking such office.

(2) No person shall seek
nomination or appointment for the office of county attorney, nor serve in
that capacity, unless he or she has been admitted to the practice of law in
this state.

(3)
The classification of counties in section 23-1114.01 applies for purposes
of this section.

Laws 1969, c. 142, § 1, p. 664;

Laws 1993, LB 468, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB55, § 1.

Classification of counties, see section 23-1114.01.